Mississippi, session 2026, HB1665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-21-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-151. Sections 73-21-151 through * * *73‑21‑163 73-21-169 shall be known as the "Pharmacy Benefit Prompt Pay Act." SECTION 2.  Section 73-21-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-153. For purposes of Sections 73-21-151 through * * *73‑21‑163 73-21-169, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Board" means the State Board of Pharmacy.                  (b)  "Clean claim" means a completed billing instrument, paper or electronic, received by a pharmacy benefit manager from a pharmacist or pharmacies or the insured, which is accepted and payment remittance advice is provided by the pharmacy benefit manager.  The term "clean claim" includes resubmitted claims with previously identified deficiencies corrected. (c) "Commissioner" means the Mississippi Commissioner of Insurance. ( * * *cd)  "Day" means a calendar day, unless otherwise defined or limited. (e) "Drug" has the same definition as provided in Section 73-21-73. ( * * *df)  "Electronic claim" means the transmission of data for purposes of payment of covered prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services in an electronic data format specified by a pharmacy benefit manager and approved by the department. ( * * *eg)  "Electronic adjudication" means the process of electronically receiving * * *, and reviewing an electronic claim and either accepting and providing payment remittance advice for the electronic claim or rejecting * * *an the electronic claim. ( * * *fh)  "Enrollee" means an individual who has been enrolled in a pharmacy benefit management plan or health insurance plan. ( * * *gi)  "Health insurance plan" means benefits consisting of prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services provided directly, through insurance or reimbursement, or otherwise and including items and services paid for as prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization agreement, or health maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer. (j) "Network pharmacy" means a pharmacy licensed by the board which provides pharmacy services to Mississippi consumers and has a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement rate. (k) "Payment remittance advice" means the claim detail that the pharmacy receives when successfully processing an electronic or paper claim.  The claim detail must contain, but is not limited to: (i) The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO will reimburse for product ingredient; and (ii) The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO will reimburse for product dispensing fee; and (iii) The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager or health insurance plan dictates the patient must pay. (l) "Pharmacist" has the same definition as provided in Section 73-21-73. (m) "Pharmacy" has the same definition as provided in Section 73-21-73. (n) "Pharmacy acquisition cost" means the amount that a pharmaceutical wholesaler charges for a pharmaceutical product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice. ( * * *ho)  "Pharmacy benefit manager" * * *shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73‑21‑179. However, through June 30, 2014, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include an insurance company that provides an integrated health benefit plan and that does not separately contract for pharmacy benefit management services.  From and after July 1, 2014, means an entity that provides pharmacy benefit management services.  The term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include: (i) An insurance company unless the insurance company is providing services as a pharmacy benefit manager * * * as defined in Section 73‑21‑179, in which case the insurance company shall be subject to * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑159 this act only for those pharmacy benefit manager services * * *.  In addition, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include the pharmacy benefit manager of the Mississippi State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan or ; or (ii) The Mississippi Division of Medicaid or its contractors when performing pharmacy benefit manager services for the Division of Medicaid. ( * * *ip)  "Pharmacy benefit manager affiliate" means * * *a pharmacy or pharmacist an entity that, directly or indirectly, * * *through one or more intermediaries, owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with a pharmacy benefit manager. ( * * *jq)  "Pharmacy benefit management plan" * * *shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73‑21‑179 means an arrangement for the delivery of pharmacist's services in which a pharmacy benefit manager undertakes to administer the payment or reimbursement of any of the costs of pharmacist's services, drugs or devices. (r) "Pharmacy benefit management services" includes, but is not limited to, the following services, which may be provided either directly or through outsourcing or contracts: (i) Adjudicate drug claims or any portion of the transaction; (ii) Contract with retail and mail pharmacy networks; (iii) Establish payment levels for pharmacies; (iv) Develop formularies or drug lists of covered therapies; (v) Provide benefit design consultation; (vi) Manage cost and utilization trends; (vii) Contract for manufacturer rebates; (viii) Provide fee-based clinical services to improve member care; (ix) Third-party administration; and (x) Sponsoring or providing cash discount cards, as defined in Section 83-9-6.1, and electronic discount cards. (s) "Pharmacist services" means products, goods and services, or any combination of products, goods and services, provided as part of the practice of pharmacy. (t) "Pharmacy services administrative organization" or "PSAO" means an entity that contracts with a pharmacy or pharmacist to assist with third-party payer interactions and which may provide a variety of other administrative services, including, but not limited to, contracting with third-party payers or pharmacy benefit managers on behalf of pharmacies and providing pharmacies or pharmacists with credentialing, billing, audit, general business and analytic support.  A covered entity, as defined in 42 USC Section 256b, including its pharmacy or the transactions related to the 340B drug discount program of a pharmacy contracted with the participating covered entity to dispense drugs purchased through the 340B drug discount program, is not considered to be a pharmacy services administrative organization. (u) "Plan sponsors" means the employers, insurance companies, unions and health maintenance organizations that contract, either directly or indirectly, with a pharmacy benefit manager for delivery of prescription drugs or services, or both. (v) "Proprietary information" means information on pricing, costs, revenue, taxes, market share, negotiating strategies, customers and personnel that is held by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO and used for its business purposes. (w) "Rebate" means any and all payments and price concessions that accrue to a pharmacy benefit manager or its plan sponsor client, directly or indirectly, including through an affiliate, subsidiary, third party or intermediary, including off-shore group purchasing organizations, from a pharmaceutical manufacturer, its affiliate, subsidiary, third party or intermediary, including, but not limited to, payments, discounts, administration fees, credits, incentives, price concessions or penalties associated, directly or indirectly, in any way with claims administered on behalf of a plan sponsor. (x) "Spread pricing" means an amount charged or claimed by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO in excess of the ingredient cost for a dispensed prescription drug plus dispensing fee paid directly or indirectly to a pharmacy, pharmacist or other provider on behalf of the health benefit plan. * * *  (k)  "Pharmacist," "pharmacist services" and "pharmacy" or "pharmacies" shall have the same definitions as provided in Section 73‑21‑73. ( * * *ly)  "Uniform claim form" means a form prescribed by rule by the * * *State Board of Pharmacy board; however, for purposes of * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑159 this act, the board shall adopt the same definition or rule where the State Department of Insurance has adopted a rule covering the same type of claim.  The board may modify the terminology of the rule and form when necessary to comply with the provisions of * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑159 this act. (z) "Wholesale acquisition cost" means the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug as defined in 42 USC Section 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B). * * *  (m)  "Plan sponsors" means the employers, insurance companies, unions and health maintenance organizations that contract with a pharmacy benefit manager for delivery of prescription services. SECTION 3.  Section 73-21-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-155. (1)  (a)  Reimbursement * * *under a contract to a pharmacist or pharmacy by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO for the dispensing of a prescription drug * * *s and other products and supplies * * *that is calculated according to a formula that uses Medi‑Span, Gold Standard or a nationally recognized reference that has been approved by the board in the pricing calculation shall use the most current reference price or amount in the actual or constructive possession of the pharmacy benefit manager, its agent, or any other party responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies on the date of electronic adjudication or on the date of service shown on the nonelectronic claim. shall be a net amount not less than the pharmacy acquisition cost. (b) A contract for pharmacy benefit management services must include a provision establishing that the reimbursements made under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be a net amount not less than the pharmacy acquisition cost. (2) * * *Pharmacy benefit managers, their agents and other parties responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies shall be required to update the nationally recognized reference prices or amounts used for calculation of reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies no less than every three (3) business days. (3)  (a)  All benefits payable * * *under from a pharmacy benefit * * *management plan manager or PSAO shall be paid within seven (7) days after receipt of * * *due written proof of a clean electronic claim where * * *claims are submitted the claim was electronically adjudicated, and shall be paid within thirty-five (35) days after receipt of due written proof of a clean claim where claims are submitted in paper format.  Benefits * * *due under the plan and claims are overdue if not paid within seven (7) days or thirty-five (35) days, whichever is applicable, after the pharmacy benefit manager receives a clean claim containing necessary information essential for the pharmacy benefit manager to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits and subrogation provisions under the plan sponsor's * * *health insurance plan.  * * *  A "clean claim" means a claim received by any pharmacy benefit manager for adjudication and which requires no further information, adjustment or alteration by the pharmacist or pharmacies or the insured in order to be processed and paid by the pharmacy benefit manager.  A claim is clean if it has no defect or impropriety, including any lack of substantiating documentation, or particular circumstance requiring special treatment that prevents timely payment from being made on the claim under this subsection.  A clean claim includes resubmitted claims with previously identified deficiencies corrected. * * *  (b)  A clean claim does not include any of the following: (i)  A duplicate claim, which means an original claim and its duplicate when the duplicate is filed within thirty (30) days of the original claim; (ii)  Claims which are submitted fraudulently or that are based upon material misrepresentations; (iii)  Claims that require information essential for the pharmacy benefit manager to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits or subrogation provisions under the plan sponsor's health insurance plan; or (iv)  Claims submitted by a pharmacist or pharmacy more than thirty (30) days after the date of service; if the pharmacist or pharmacy does not submit the claim on behalf of the insured, then a claim is not clean when submitted more than thirty (30) days after the date of billing by the pharmacist or pharmacy to the insured. ( * * *cb)  * * *Not later than seven (7) days after the date the pharmacy benefit manager actually receives If an electronic claim is denied, the pharmacy benefit manager shall * * *pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the pharmacist or pharmacy * * *(where the claim is owed to the pharmacist or pharmacy) within seven (7) days of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  * * *Not If a written claim is denied, the pharmacy benefit manager shall notify the pharmacy or pharmacies no later than thirty-five (35) days * * *after the date the pharmacy benefit manager actually receives a paper of receipt of the claim * * *,.  The pharmacy benefit manager shall * * *pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the pharmacist or pharmacy * * *(where the claim is owed to the pharmacist or pharmacy) of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  Any claim or portion thereof resubmitted with the supporting documentation and information requested by the pharmacy benefit manager shall be paid within twenty (20) days after receipt. ( * * *43)  If the board finds that any pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO, agent or other party responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies has not paid ninety-five percent (95%) of clean claims, as defined in * * *subsection (3) of this Section 73-21-153, received from all pharmacies in a calendar quarter, * * *he the pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO, agent or other party shall be subject to an administrative penalty of not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to be assessed by the State Board of Pharmacy and deposited into the special fund used by the board to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (a) Examinations to determine compliance with this * * *subsection section may be conducted by the board.  The board may contract with qualified impartial outside sources to assist in examinations to determine compliance.  * * *  The expenses of any such examinations shall be paid by the pharmacy benefit manager examined. (b) Nothing in the provisions of this section shall require a pharmacy benefit manager to pay claims that are not covered under the terms of a contract * * * or, plan, policy of accident and sickness insurance or prepaid coverage. * * *  (c)  If the claim is not denied for valid and proper reasons by the end of the applicable time period prescribed in this provision, the pharmacy benefit manager must pay the pharmacy (where the claim is owed to the pharmacy) or the patient (where the claim is owed to a patient) interest on accrued benefits at the rate of one and one‑half percent (1‑1/2%) per month accruing from the day after payment was due on the amount of the benefits that remain unpaid until the claim is finally settled or adjudicated.  Whenever interest due pursuant to this provision is less than One Dollar ($1.00), such amount shall be credited to the account of the person or entity to whom such amount is owed. ( * * *dc)  Any pharmacy benefit manager * * *and a pharmacy may enter into an express written agreement * * *containing with a pharmacy or PSAO on behalf of a pharmacy that contains timely claim payment provisions which differ from, but are at least as stringent as, the provisions set forth under subsection ( * * *32) of this section, and in such case, the provisions of the written agreement shall govern the timely payment of claims by the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO to the pharmacy.  If the express written agreement is silent as to any interest penalty where claims are not paid in accordance with the agreement, the interest penalty provision of subsection (4) * * *(c) of this section shall apply. ( * * *ed)  The State Board of Pharmacy may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with this subsection. ( * * *54)  If a clean claim is not paid or is denied without providing to the pharmacy a valid and proper reason as to why the claim is not clean by the end of the applicable time period prescribed in this section, the pharmacy benefit manager must pay the pharmacy (when the claim is owed to the pharmacy) or the patient (when the claim is owed to a patient) interest on accrued benefits at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) per month accruing from the day after payment was due on the amount of the benefits that remain unpaid until the claim is finally settled or adjudicated.  Whenever interest due pursuant to this subsection is less than One Dollar ($1.00), such amount shall be credited to the account of the person or entity to whom such amount is owed. (5) (a)  * * *For purposes of this subsection (5), "network pharmacy" means a licensed pharmacy in this state that has a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement rate.  A network pharmacy or pharmacist may decline to provide a brand name drug, * * *multisource generic drug, biosimilar drug or service, if the network pharmacy or pharmacist is paid less than that network pharmacy's acquisition cost for the * * *product prescription.  If the network pharmacy or pharmacist declines to provide such drug or service, the pharmacy or pharmacist shall provide the customer with adequate information as to where the prescription for the drug or service may be filled.  A pharmacy benefit manager may not require a pharmacy or pharmacist to submit a claim for payment through a plan of the patient when the patient requests to pay for the prescription drug with cash or an alternative payment method. (b) The State Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and ensure compliance with this subsection, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations that address access to pharmacy services in rural or underserved areas and also in cases where a network pharmacy or pharmacist declines to provide a drug or service under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  * * *  The board shall promulgate the rules and regulations required by this paragraph (b) not later than October 1, 2016. (6) A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall not directly or indirectly retroactively deny or reduce a claim or aggregate of claims after the claim or aggregate of claims has been adjudicated. (7) A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO may not impose a fee or otherwise adjust or lower the reimbursement of a claim at the time the claim is adjudicated, or after the claim is adjudicated, which reduces the amount of the reimbursement for the claim. SECTION 4.  Section 73-21-156, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-156. (1)  * * *As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a) "Maximum allowable cost list" means a listing of drugs or other methodology used by a pharmacy benefit manager, directly or indirectly, setting the maximum allowable payment to a pharmacy or pharmacist for a generic drug, brand‑name drug, biologic product or other prescription drug.  The term "maximum allowable cost list" includes without limitation: (i) Average acquisition cost, including national average drug acquisition cost; (ii) Average manufacturer price; (iii) Average wholesale price; (iv) Brand effective rate or generic effective rate; (v) Discount indexing; (vi) Federal upper limits; (vii) Wholesale acquisition cost; and (viii)  Any other term that a pharmacy benefit manager or a health care insurer may use to establish reimbursement rates to a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services. (b) "Pharmacy acquisition cost" means the amount that a pharmaceutical wholesaler charges for a pharmaceutical product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice. (2) Before a pharmacy benefit manager places or continues a particular drug on a maximum allowable cost list, the drug: (a) If the drug is a generic equivalent drug product as defined in 73‑21‑73, shall be listed as therapeutically equivalent and pharmaceutically equivalent "A" or "B" rated in the United States Food and Drug Administration's most recent version of the "Orange Book" or "Green Book" or have an NR or NA rating by Medi‑Span, Gold Standard, or a similar rating by a nationally recognized reference approved by the board; (b)  Shall be available for purchase by each pharmacy in the state from national or regional wholesalers operating in Mississippi; and (c) Shall not be obsolete. (3)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a)  Provide access to its maximum allowable cost list to each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list; (b) Update its maximum allowable cost list on a timely basis, but in no event longer than three (3) calendar days; and (c) Provide a process for each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list to receive prompt notification of an update to the maximum allowable cost list. (4)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a) Provide a reasonable administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge * * *a maximum allowable cost list and reimbursements made * * *under a maximum allowable cost list for a specific drug or drugs as: (i) Not meeting the requirements of this section; or (ii) * * * Being below the pharmacy acquisition cost Being below the reimbursement rate required under subsection (1) of Section 73-21-155. (b)  The reasonable administrative appeal procedure shall include the following: (i)  A * * *dedicated telephone number * * *, and email address * * *and website for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals on the main page of the website of the pharmacy benefit manager which provides direct access to the claim appeals department; (ii)  The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a detailed written response within seven (7) days of receipt of an email or telephone call from a pharmacist or pharmacy regarding an issue with an administrative appeal; (iii) The website of the pharmacy benefit manager must include easily accessible administrative appeal instructions and list any other required information to be submitted by pharmacies for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals; (iv) The ability to submit * * *an a single  administrative appeal or a claim appeal report for multiple claims directly to the pharmacy benefit manager * * *regarding the pharmacy benefit management plan or through a * * *pharmacy service administrative organization PSAO; and ( * * *iiiv) A period of no less than thirty (30) * * *business days to file an administrative appeal. (c)  The pharmacy benefit manager shall respond to the challenge under * * *paragraph (a) of this subsection * * *(4) within thirty (30) * * *business days after receipt of the challenge. (d) If a challenge is made under * * *paragraph (a) of this subsection * * * (4), the pharmacy benefit manager shall, within thirty (30) * * *business days after receipt of the challenge, either: (i)  * * *If Uphold the appeal * * *is upheld and: 1.  * * *Make the change in the maximum allowable cost list payment to at least the pharmacy acquisition cost; Adjust the reimbursement or reimbursements paid to the pharmacist or pharmacy to the amount required under subsection (1) of Section 73-21-155; and 2. Permit the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist to reverse and rebill the claim in question; and * * *    3.  Provide the National Drug Code that the increase or change is based on to the pharmacy or pharmacist; and * * *4.3.  Make the * * *change under item 1 of this subparagraph (i) adjustment for that National Drug Code effective for * * *each similarly situated the pharmacy * * *as defined by the payor subject to the maximum allowable cost list that filed the claim for a time period of no less than ninety (90) days from the date the claim appeal was upheld; or (ii)  * * *If Deny the appeal * * *is denied, and provide the reason for the denial in writing to the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist * * * the National Drug Code and the name of the national or regional pharmaceutical wholesalers operating in Mississippi that have the drug currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list; or (iii) If the National Drug Code provided by the pharmacy benefit manager is not available below the pharmacy acquisition cost from the pharmaceutical wholesaler from whom the pharmacy or pharmacist purchases the majority of prescription drugs for resale, then the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list above the challenging pharmacy's pharmacy acquisition cost and permit the pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim affected by the inability to procure the drug at a cost that is equal to or less than the previously challenged maximum allowable cost. (e) The board may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with this subsection. (2)  A pharmacy benefit manager may not deny an appeal submitted pursuant to this section based upon an existing contracted rate with the pharmacy. (3) A pharmacy or pharmacist that belongs to a PSAO must be provided a true and correct copy of a contract and contract amendment that the PSAO enters into with a pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payer on the pharmacy's or pharmacist's behalf. ( * * *54) * * *(a)  A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall not reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in the state an amount less than the amount that the pharmacy benefit manager reimburses a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for providing the * * *same pharmacist services drug, and the amount reimbursed may not be less than the amount prescribed pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 73-21-155. * * *  (b)  The reimbursement amount for a drug shall be calculated on a per unit basis based on the same brand and generic product identifier or brand and generic code number. (5) The pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO may not require a pharmacy to collect additional monies following a successful below-cost reimbursement appeal from a person or entity other than the pharmacy benefit manager who adjudicated the drug claim, including the patient or plan sponsor. SECTION 5.  Section 73-21-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-157. (1)  Before beginning to do business as a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall obtain a license to do business from the board.  To obtain a license, the applicant shall submit an application to the board on a form to be prescribed by the board.  The license must be renewed annually. (2) When applying for a license or renewal of a license, each pharmacy benefit manager * * *providing pharmacy management benefit plans in this state shall file * * *a statement with the board * * * annually by March 1 or within sixty (60) days of the end of its fiscal year if not a calendar year.  The statement shall be verified by at least two (2) principal officers and shall cover the preceding calendar year or the immediately preceding fiscal year of the pharmacy benefit manager. (3)  The statement shall be on forms prescribed by the board and shall include: (a) (i)  A copy of a certified audit report, if the pharmacy benefit manager has been audited by a certified public accountant within the last twenty-four (24) months; of (ii) If the pharmacy benefit manager has not been audited in the last twenty-four (24) months, a financial statement of the organization, including its balance sheet and income statement for the preceding year which is verified by at least two (2) principal officers; and (b) Any other information relating to the operations of the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO required by the board * * * under this section. ( * * *43)  (a)  Any information required to be submitted to the board pursuant to licensure application that is considered proprietary by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall be marked as confidential when submitted to the board.  All such information shall not be subject to the provisions of the federal Freedom of Information Act or the Mississippi Public Records Act and shall not be released by the board unless subject to an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.  The board shall destroy or delete or cause to be destroyed or deleted all such information thirty (30) days after the board determines that the information is no longer necessary or useful. (b) Any person who knowingly releases, causes to be released or assists in the release of any such information shall be subject to a monetary penalty imposed by the board in an amount not exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per violation.  When the board is considering the imposition of any penalty under this paragraph (b), it shall follow the same policies and procedures provided for the imposition of other sanctions in the Pharmacy Practice Act.  Any penalty collected under this paragraph (b) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board and used to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (c) All employees of the board who have access to the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be fingerprinted, and the board shall submit a set of fingerprints for each employee to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history records check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records check. ( * * *54)  * * *If the pharmacy benefit manager is audited annually by an independent certified public accountant, a copy of the certified audit report shall be filed annually with the board by June 30 or within thirty (30) days of the report being final. (6)  The board may extend the time prescribed for any pharmacy benefit manager for filing annual statements or other reports or exhibits of any kind for good cause shown.  However, the board shall not extend the time for filing annual statements beyond sixty (60) days after the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section.  The board may waive the requirements for filing financial information for the pharmacy benefit manager if an affiliate of the pharmacy benefit manager is already required to file such information under current law with the Commissioner of Insurance and allow the pharmacy benefit manager to file a copy of documents containing such information with the board in lieu of the statement required by this section. ( * * *75)  The expense of administering this section shall be assessed annually by the board against all pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs operating in this state. ( * * *86)  A pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO or third-party payor * * *may shall not require pharmacy accreditation standards or * * *recertification certification requirements inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to federal and state requirements for licensure as a pharmacy in this state. SECTION 6.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-158, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-158. (1)  A pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from engaging in spread pricing. Separately identified administrative fees or costs are exempt from this requirement, if mutually agreed upon in writing by the payor and pharmacy benefit manager. (2) A pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payer may not charge or cause a patient to pay an amount that exceeds the total amount retained by the pharmacy. (3)  Every pharmacy benefit manager and PSAO shall disclose and pass on to the plan sponsor or employer one hundred percent (100%) of all rebates and other payments that the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO receives directly or indirectly from pharmaceutical manufacturers and/or rebate aggregators in connection with claims administered on behalf of the plan sponsor or employer and the recipients of such rebates. In addition, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall report annually to each plan sponsor or employer the aggregate amount of all rebates and other payments and the recipients of such rebates. (4) A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO may not charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to the adjudication of a claim, including, without limitation, a fee for: (a) The submission or processing of a claim; (b) The adjudication of a claim; (c) Enrollment or participation in a pharmacy network; or (d) The development or management of claims processing services or claims payment services related to participation in a pharmacy network. (5) A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall not charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a fee related to participation in a pharmacy network, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) An application fee; (b) An enrollment or participation fee; (c) A credentialing or re-credentialing fee; (d) A change of ownership fee; or (e) A fee for the development or management of claims processing services or claims payment services. SECTION 7.  Section 73-21-159, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-159. (1)  In lieu of or in addition to making its own financial examination of a pharmacy benefit manager, the board may accept the report of a financial examination of other persons responsible for the pharmacy benefit manager under the laws of another state certified by the applicable official of such other state. (2) The board shall coordinate financial examinations of a pharmacy benefit manager that provides pharmacy management benefit plans in this state to ensure an appropriate level of regulatory oversight and to avoid any undue duplication of effort or regulation.  The pharmacy benefit manager being examined shall pay the cost of the examination.  The cost of the examination shall be deposited in a special fund that shall provide all expenses for the licensing, supervision and examination of all pharmacy benefit managers subject to regulation under Sections 73-21-71 through 73-21-129 and Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑163 73-21-169. (3) The board may provide a copy of the financial examination to the person or entity who provides or operates the health insurance plan or to a pharmacist or pharmacy. (4) The board is authorized to hire independent financial consultants to conduct financial examinations of a pharmacy benefit manager and to expend funds collected under this section to pay the costs of such examinations. SECTION 8.  Section 73-21-161, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-161. (1)  As used in this section, the term * * *"referral" "steering" means: (a) * * *Ordering of a patient to a pharmacy by a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate either orally or in writing, including online messaging; (b)  Offering or implementing plan designs that require patients to use affiliated pharmacies; or (c)  Patient or prospective patient specific advertising, marketing, or promotion of a pharmacy by an affiliate. Directing, ordering or requiring a patient to use a specific affiliate pharmacy or pharmacies for the purpose of filling a prescription or receiving services or other care from a pharmacist; (b) Offering or implementing plan designs that require a patient to utilize an affiliate pharmacy or pharmacies, or that increase costs to a patient, including, but not limited to, requiring a patient to pay the full cost for a prescription drug when the patient chooses not to use a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate pharmacy; (c) Advertising, marketing or promoting an affiliate pharmacy or pharmacies over another in-network pharmacy, but * * * The term "referral" does not include a pharmacy's inclusion by a pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate in communications to patients, including patient and prospective patient specific communications, regarding network pharmacies and prices, provided that the pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate includes information regarding eligible nonaffiliate pharmacies in those communications and the information provided is accurate * * *.; (d) Creating a network or engaging in a practice, including accreditation or credentialing standards, day supply requirements or delivery methods requirements, which excludes an in-network pharmacy or restricts an in-network pharmacy from filling a prescription for a prescription drug; or (e) Directly or indirectly engaging in a practice that attempts to influence or induce a pharmaceutical manufacturer to limit the distribution of a prescription drug to a small number of pharmacies or certain types of pharmacies, or to restrict distribution of that drug to nonaffiliate pharmacies. (2) A pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate licensed or operating in Mississippi shall be prohibited from: (a) * * *Making referrals Steering; (b) Transferring or sharing records relative to prescription information containing patient identifiable and prescriber identifiable data to or from a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for any commercial purpose; however, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the exchange of prescription information between a pharmacy and its affiliate for the limited purposes of: pharmacy reimbursement; formulary compliance; pharmacy care; public health activities otherwise authorized by law; or utilization review by a health care provider; * * * or (c) Presenting a claim for payment to any individual, third-party payor, affiliate, or other entity for a prescription drug or service furnished * * *pursuant to a referral by steering from * * *an a pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate * * *.; or (d) Interfering with the patient's right to choose the patient's pharmacy or provider of choice, including inducement, required referrals or offering financial or other incentives or measures that would constitute a violation of Section 83-9-6. (3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a pharmacy from entering into an agreement with a pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate to provide pharmacy care to patients, provided that neither the pharmacy * * *does not receive referrals in violation of nor the pharmacy benefit manager affiliate violates subsection (2) of this section and the pharmacy provides the disclosures required in subsection (1) of this section. * * * (4)   * * *If a pharmacy licensed or holding a nonresident pharmacy permit in this state has an affiliate, it shall annually file with the board a disclosure statement identifying all such affiliates. ( * * *54)  In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a violation of this section by a pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the board under its authority granted in this chapter. ( * * *65)  A pharmacist who fills a prescription that violates subsection (2) of this section shall not be liable under this section. (6) This section does not apply to facilities licensed to fill prescriptions solely for employees of a plan sponsor or employer. SECTION 9.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-162, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-162. (1)  (a)  Retaliation is prohibited. (b) A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO may not retaliate against a pharmacist or pharmacy based on the pharmacist's or pharmacy's exercise of a right or remedy under this chapter.  Retaliation prohibited by this section includes, but is not limited to: (i) Terminating or refusing to renew a contract with the pharmacist or pharmacy; (ii) Subjecting the pharmacist or pharmacy to an increased frequency of audits, number of claims audited, or amount of monies for claims audited; or (iii) Failing to promptly pay the pharmacist or pharmacy money owed by the pharmacy benefit manager to the pharmacist or pharmacy. (c) For the purposes of this section, a pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO is not considered to have retaliated against a pharmacy if the pharmacy benefit manager: (i) Takes an action in response to a credible allegation of fraud against the pharmacist or pharmacy; and (ii) Provides reasonable notice and a reasonable opportunity to respond to the pharmacist or pharmacy of the allegation of fraud and the basis of the allegation before initiating an action. (2) A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO may not penalize or retaliate against a pharmacist, pharmacy or pharmacy employee for exercising rights under this chapter, initiating a judicial or regulatory action or discussing or disclosing information pertaining to an agreement with a pharmacy benefit manager or a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate when testifying or otherwise appearing before a governmental agency, legislative member or body, or a judicial authority. SECTION 10.  Section 73-21-163, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-163. (1)  Whenever the board has reason to believe that a pharmacy benefit manager * * * or, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO is using, has used, or is about to use any method, act or practice prohibited in * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act and that proceedings would be in the public interest, it may bring an action in the name of the board against the pharmacy benefit manager * * * or, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of such method, act or practice.  The action shall be brought in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  The court is authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act, and such injunctions shall be issued without bond. (2) The board may impose a monetary penalty on a pharmacy benefit manager * * * or a, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO for noncompliance with the provisions of * * *the Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act, in amounts of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per violation.  Each day a violation continues for the same brand or generic product identifier or brand or generic code number is a separate violation.  Each day that a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO does business in this state without a license is deemed a separate violation.  The board shall prepare a record entered upon its minutes that states the basic facts upon which the monetary penalty was imposed and reduce its decision to writing.  Each instance that a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO fails to comply with the written order of the board is a separate violation of this act.  Any penalty collected under this subsection (2) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. (3) For the purposes of conducting investigations, the board, through its executive director, may conduct audits and examinations of a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO and also may issue subpoenas to any individual, pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO or other entity having documents or records that it deems relevant to the investigation. (4) The board may assess a monetary penalty for those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding, including cost of process service, court reports, expert witnesses and investigators, if the board imposes a monetary penalty under subsection (2) of this section. (5) * * *A Monetary * * *penalty penalties and costs assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee, registrant or permit holder upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under Section 73-21-101, or may be paid sooner if the licensee, registrant or permit holder elects.  Any penalty collected by the board under this subsection ( * * *35) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. ( * * *46)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee, registrant or permit holder in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee, registrant or permit holder when due under this section, the board shall have the power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, registrant or permit holder, or if the licensee, registrant or permit holder is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  When those proceedings are instituted, the board shall certify the record of its proceedings, together with all documents and evidence, to the chancery court, and the matter shall be heard in due course by the court, which shall review the record and make its determination thereon in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-21-101.  The hearing on the matter may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (7) (a)  The board may conduct audits to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act.  In conducting audits, the board may request production of documents pertaining to compliance with the provisions of this act, and documents so requested must be produced within thirty (30) days of the request unless extended by the board or its duly authorized staff. (b) If, after the conclusion of the audit, the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO is found to be in compliance with all of the requirements of this act, then the board must pay the costs of the audit.  However, the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO being audited shall pay all costs of the audit if the audit reveals noncompliance with this act.  The cost of the audit examination must be deposited into the special fund and used by the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (c)  The board may hire independent consultants to conduct audits of a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO and expend funds collected under this section to pay the cost of performing audit services. ( * * *58)  The board shall develop and implement a uniform penalty policy that sets the minimum and maximum penalty for any given violation of * * *Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act.  The board shall adhere to its uniform penalty policy except in those cases where the board specifically finds, by majority vote, that a penalty in excess of, or less than, the uniform penalty is appropriate.  That vote shall be reflected in the minutes of the board and shall not be imposed unless it appears as having been adopted by the board. SECTION 11.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-165, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-165. (1)  Each drug manufacturer shall submit a report to the Mississippi Board of Pharmacy no later than the fifteenth day of January, April, July, and October with the current wholesale acquisition cost information for the prescription drugs sold in or into the state by that drug manufacturer; however, the first report due under this subsection shall not be due until October 1, 2027. (2)  Not more than thirty (30) days after an increase in wholesale acquisition cost of forty percent (40%) or greater over the preceding five (5) calendar years or ten percent (10%) or greater in the preceding twelve (12) months for a prescription drug with a wholesale acquisition cost of Seventy Dollars ($70.00) or more for a manufacturer-packaged drug container, a drug manufacturer shall submit a report to the board.  The report must contain the following information: (a)  Name of the drug; (b)  Whether the drug is a brand name or a generic; (c)  The effective date of the change in wholesale acquisition cost; (d)  Aggregate, company-level research and development costs for the previous calendar year; (e)  Aggregate rebate amounts paid to each pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO for the previous calendar year; (f)  The name of each of the drug manufacturer's drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration in the previous five (5) calendar years; (g)  The name of each of the drug manufacturer's drugs that lost patent exclusivity in the United States in the previous five (5) calendar years; and (h)  A concise statement of rationale regarding the factor or factors that caused the increase in the wholesale acquisition cost, such as raw ingredient shortage or increase in pharmacy benefit manager's or PSAO's rebates. (3)  The quality and types of information and data a drug manufacturer submits to the board pursuant to this section must be the same as the quality and types of information and data the drug manufacturer includes in the drug manufacturer's annual consolidated report on the Securities and Exchange Commission Form 10-K or any other public disclosure.  A drug manufacturer shall notify the board in writing if the drug manufacturer is introducing a new prescription drug to market at a wholesale acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold set for a specialty drug under the Medicare Part D Program. (4)  The notice must include a concise statement of rationale regarding the factor or factors that caused the new drug to exceed the Medicare Part D Program price.  The drug manufacturer shall provide the written notice within three (3) calendar days following the release of the drug in the commercial market.  A drug manufacturer may make the notification pending approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration if commercial availability is expected within three (3) calendar days following the approval. (5)  On or before October 1st of each year, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO providing services for a health care plan shall file a report with the board.  The report must contain the following information for the previous state fiscal year: (a)  The aggregated rebates, fees, price protection payments and any other payments collected from each drug manufacturer; (b)  The aggregated dollar amount of rebates, price protection payments, fees, and any other payments collected from each drug manufacturer which were passed to health insurers; (c)  The aggregated fees, price concessions, penalties, effective rates, and any other financial incentive collected from pharmacies which were passed to enrollees at the point of sale; (d)  The aggregated dollar amount of rebates, price protection payments, fees, and any other payments collected from drug manufacturers which were retained as revenue by the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO; and (e)  The aggregated rebates passed on to employers. (6)  Reports submitted by pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs under this section may not disclose the identity of a specific health benefit plan or enrollee, the identity of a drug manufacturer, the prices charged for specific drugs or classes of drugs, or the amount of any rebates or fees provided for specific drugs or classes of drugs. (7)  On or before October 1st of each year, each health insurer shall submit a report to the board.  The report must contain the following information for the previous two (2) calendar years: (a)  Names of the twenty-five (25) most frequently prescribed drugs across all plans; (b)  Names of the twenty-five (25) prescription drugs dispensed with the highest dollar spent in terms of gross revenue; (c)  Percent of increase in annual net spending for prescription drugs across all plans; (d)  Percent of increase in premiums which is attributable to prescription drugs across all plans; (e)  Percentage of specialty drugs with utilization management requirements across all plans; and (f)  Premium reductions attributable to specialty drug utilization management. (8)  A report submitted by a health insurer may not disclose the identity of a specific health benefit plan or the prices charged for specific prescription drugs or classes of prescription drugs. SECTION 12.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-167, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-167.  Each plan sponsor shall develop a list of prescription drugs that meet the criteria established by that plan sponsor for specialty drug designation to assist with patient access, transparency and responsible cost management for the delivery of prescription drugs or services, or both. As an alternative to developing its own list, a plan sponsor may elect to adopt the specialty drug list developed by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board under Section 25-15-305 to serve as its specialty drug list. SECTION 13.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-168, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-168.  (1)  The board shall develop a website to publish information the board receives under this chapter.  The board shall make the website available on the board's website with a dedicated link prominently displayed on the home page, or by a separate, easily identifiable Internet address. (2)  Within sixty (60) days of receipt of reported information under this chapter, the board shall publish the reported information on the website developed under this section.  The information the board publishes may not disclose or tend to disclose trade secrets, proprietary, commercial, financial or confidential information of any pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO, drug wholesaler, drug manufacturer or hospital. (3)  The board may adopt rules to implement this chapter.  The board shall develop forms that must be used for reporting required under this chapter.  The board may contract for services to implement this chapter. (4)  A report received by the board is not subject to the provisions of the federal Freedom of Information Act or the Mississippi Public Records Act and may not be released by the board unless subject to an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.  The board shall destroy or delete or cause to be destroyed or deleted all such information thirty (30) days after the board determines that the information is no longer necessary or useful. SECTION 14.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-169, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-169.  (1) Pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs shall identify to the board any ownership affiliation of any kind with any pharmacy which, either directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries: (a)  Has an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority; (b)  Shares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority in this state; or (c)  Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest which is a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority issued in this state. (2)  A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall report any change in information required by this act to the board in writing within sixty (60) days after the change occurs. SECTION 15.  Section 25-15-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-301. (1)  The board * * * may shall contract the administration and service of the self-insured program to a third party.  * * * Whenever the board chooses to contract When contracting with an administrator for the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq. or components of the plan, * * * it the board shall comply with the procedures set forth in this section: (a) * * * If the board determines that it should contract out Before entering into a contract for the administration of the plan or components of the plan to an administrator, it shall cause to be prepared a request for proposals every two (2) hours.  This request for proposals shall be prepared for distribution to any interested party.  Notice of the board's intention to seek proposals shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation at least one (1) time per week for three (3) weeks before closing the period for interested parties to respond.  Additional forms of notice may also be used.  The newspaper notice shall inform the interested parties of the service to be contracted, existence of a request for proposals, how it can be obtained, when a proposal must be submitted, and to whom the proposal must be submitted.  All requests for proposals shall describe clearly what service is to be contracted, and shall fully explain the criteria upon which an evaluation of proposals shall be based.  The criteria to be used for evaluations shall, at minimum, include: (i) The administrator's proven ability to handle * * *large group accident and health insurance plans comparable to the plan; (ii) The efficiency of the claims-paying procedures; and (iii) * * *An estimate of The total charges for administering the plan. (b) All proposals submitted by interested parties shall be evaluated by an internal review committee which shall apply the same criteria to all proposals when conducting an evaluation.  The committee shall consist of at least three (3) members of the board.  When the proposal under evaluation is for pharmacy benefits or the management thereof, the Executive Director of the State Board of Pharmacy, or his or her designee, shall be one (1) of the members of the evaluation committee.  The results and recommendations of the evaluation shall be presented to the board for review.  All evaluations presented to the board shall be retained by the board for at least three (3) years.  The board may accept or reject any recommendation of the review committee, or it may conduct further inquiry into the proposals.  Any further inquiry shall be clearly documented and all methods and recommendations shall be retained by the board and shall spread upon its minutes its choice of administrator and its reasons for making the choice. (c) (i)  The board shall be responsible for preparing a contract that shall be in accordance with all provisions of this section and all other provisions of law.  The contract shall also include a requirement that the contractor shall consent to an evaluation of his performance.  Such evaluation shall occur after the first six (6) months of the contract, and the contractor's performance shall be reviewed at times the board determines to be necessary.  The contract shall clearly describe the standards upon which the contractor shall be evaluated.  Evaluations shall include, but not be limited to, efficiency in claims processing, including the processing pending claims. (ii) The PEER Committee, at the request of the House or Senate Appropriations Committee or the House or Senate Insurance Committee and with funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose, shall contract with an accounting firm or with other professionals to conduct a compliance audit of any administrator responsible for administering the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq. or components of the plan.  Such audit shall review the administrator's compliance with the performance standards required for inclusion in the administrator's contract.  Such audit shall be delivered to the Legislature no later than January 1. (iii) An audit for pharmacy benefits or the management of pharmacy benefits also may be conducted by the State Board of Pharmacy under the provisions of Chapter 21, Title 73, Mississippi Code 1972.  Any audit conducted by the State Board of Pharmacy must be provided to the board and the PEER Committee within fifteen (15) days of final adoption of the results by the State Board of Pharmacy. (2) Contracts for the administration of the insurance plan established in Section 25-15-3 et seq. or components of the plan shall be for a term of two (2) years and shall commence at the beginning of the calendar year and shall end on the last day of * * * a the next succeeding calendar year.  This shall not apply to contracts provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (3) If the board determines that it is necessary * * * to not renew the contract of an administrator, or finds it necessary to terminate a contract with or without cause as provided for in the contract of the administrator, the board is authorized to select an administrator without complying with the bid requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.  Such contracts shall be for the balance of the calendar year in which the * * * nonrenewal or termination occurred * * *, and may be for an additional calendar year if the board determines that the best interests of the plan members are served by such. Any contract negotiated on an interim basis shall include a detailed transition plan which shall ensure the orderly transfer of responsibilities between administrators and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding the transfer of records, files and tapes. (4) Except for contracts executed under the authority of subsection (3) of this section, the board shall select administrators at least six (6) months before the expiration of the current administrator's contract.  The period between the selection of the new administrator and the effective date of the new contract shall be known as the transition period.  Whenever the newly selected administrator is an entity different from the entity performing the administrator's function, it shall be the duty of the board to prepare a detailed transition plan which shall insure the orderly transfer of responsibilities between administrators.  This plan shall be effective during the transition period, and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding the transfer of records, files and tapes.  Further, the plan shall detail the steps necessary to transfer records and responsibilities and set deadlines for when such steps should be completed.  The board shall include in all requests for proposals, contracts with administrators, and all other contracts, provisions requiring the cooperation of administrators and contractors in any future transition of responsibilities, and their cooperation with the board and other contractors with respect to ongoing coordination and delivery of health plan services.  The board shall furnish the Legislature, Governor and advisory council with copies of all transition plans and keep them informed of progress on such plans. (5) No brokerage fees shall be paid for the securing or executing of any contracts pertaining to the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq. or components of the plan, whether fully insured or self-insured. (6) (a)  Any corporation, association, company, entity or individual that contracts with the board for the administration or service of the self-insured plan shall remit one hundred percent (100%) of all savings or discounts resulting from any contract to the board or participant, or both.  Any corporation, association, company, entity or individual that contracts with the board for the administration or service of the self-insured plan shall allow, upon notice by the board, the board or its designee to audit records of the corporation, association, company, entity or individual relative to the corporation, association, company, entity or individual's performance under any contract with the board.  The information maintained by any corporation, association, company, entity or individual, relating to such contracts, shall be available for inspection upon request by the board and such information shall be compiled in a manner that will provide a clear audit trail. (b) A corporation, association, company, entity or individual that contracts with the board for the administration or service of the pharmacy benefits or management of pharmacy benefits of the self-insured plan shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 21, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972.  If there is a conflict in the application or interpretation of these provisions, then the provision of Chapter 21, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972, will prevail. SECTION 16.  Section 25-15-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-303. (1)  There is created the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, which shall administer the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan provided for under Section 25-15-3 et seq.  The State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, hereafter referred to as the "board," shall also be responsible for administering all procedures for selecting third-party administrators provided for in Section 25-15-301. (2) The board shall consist of the following: (a) The Chairman of the Workers' Compensation Commission or his or her designee; (b) The State Personnel Director, or his or her designee; (c) The Commissioner of Insurance, or his or her designee; (d) The * * * Commissioner of Higher Education Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid, or his or her designee; * * *  (e)  The State Superintendent of Public Education, or his or her designee; ( * * *fe)  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his or her designee; * * *  (g)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board, or his or her designee; ( * * *hf)  The Executive Director of the Public Employees' Retirement System, or his or her designee; (g) The Executive Director of the State Board of Pharmacy, or his or her designee; ( * * *ih)  Two (2) appointees of the Governor whose terms shall be concurrent with that of the Governor, one (1) of whom shall have experience in providing actuarial advice to companies that provide health insurance to large groups and one (1) of whom shall have experience in the day-to-day management and administration of a large self-funded health insurance group; ( * * *ji)  * * * The Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, or his or her designee A representative of the Mississippi Association of Health Plans; ( * * *kj)  * * * The Chairman of the House of Representatives Insurance Committee, or his or her designee An independent pharmacist, appointed by the Mississippi Independent Pharmacies Association; (k) A pharmacy benefit manager licensed to do business in Mississippi, appointed by the Mississippi Association of Self-Insurers; (l) A plan sponsor, as defined in Section 73-21-153, or a third party administrator doing business in Mississippi, appointed by the Mississippi Association of Self-Insurers; ( * * *lm)  The Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, or his or her designee; and ( * * *mn)  The Chairman of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee, or his or her designee. The legislators, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the board. The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be the chairman of the board. (3) The board shall meet at least monthly and maintain minutes of the meetings.  A quorum shall consist of a majority of the authorized voting membership of the board.  The board shall have the sole authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the operations of the insurance plans and shall be vested with all legal authority necessary and proper to perform this function including, but not limited to: (a) Defining the scope and coverages provided by the insurance plan; (b) Seeking proposals for services or insurance through competitive processes where required by law and selecting service providers or insurers under procedures provided for by law; and (c) Developing and adopting strategic plans and budgets for the insurance plan. The department shall employ a State Insurance Administrator, who shall be responsible for the day-to-day management and administration of the insurance plan.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide to the board on a full-time basis personnel and technical support necessary and sufficient to effectively and efficiently carry out the requirements of this section. (4) Members of the board shall not receive any compensation or per diem, but may receive travel reimbursement provided for under Section 25-3-41 except that the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the board shall be paid while the Legislature is in session. SECTION 17.  The following shall be codified as Section 25-15-305, Mississippi Code of 1972: 25-15-305.  (1)  The State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board shall develop a list of prescription drugs that meet the criteria established by the board for specialty drug designation to assist with patient access, transparency and responsible cost management.  The board shall meet to review and update the specialty drug list based on market trends, clinical data and stakeholder input. (2) A contract entered into pursuant to Section 25-15-301 for the administration of the plan or for the provision or administration of pharmacy benefit management services, as defined under Section 73-21-153, must include a provision requiring the corporation, association, company, entity or individual that is a party to the contract to adhere to the established list of specialty drugs when contracting with a pharmacy and establishing payment levels and adjudicating drug claims or any portion of the transaction.  Noncompliance with this subsection or the failure to adhere to the established list of specialty drugs is deemed to be a violation of this section and may be deemed by the board as cause for termination of the contract. (3) The board shall consult with the state agency or entity in the four (4) states contiguous to Mississippi to determine the feasibility of entering into a joint agreement that enables the parties to the agreement to achieve greater purchasing power of pharmaceuticals in the states that are a party to the agreement.  Before March 1, 2027, the board shall submit a detailed report of its findings and recommendations to the State Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives and the Insurance Committee of the Senate. SECTION 18.  Section 25-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-15-11.  (1)  The board is authorized to execute a contract or contracts to provide the benefits under the plan.  Such contract or contracts may be executed with one or more corporations or associations licensed to transact life and accident and health insurance business in this state; however, no such contract shall be executed with any corporation, association or company domiciled in any other state except that such corporation, association or company shall meet the conditions and terms for a like contract established by the state of the domicile of such corporation, association or company for a Mississippi corporation, association or company.  No corporation, association or company with less than five (5) years' experience in the life and health field may bid.  All of the benefits to be provided under the plan may be included in one or more similar contracts, or the benefits may be classified into different types with each type included under one or more similar contracts issued by the same or different companies. The board shall supply the statistical information upon which a quotation is to be calculated, upon request, to all carriers licensed in the state.  Bids may be accepted at the discretion of the board, and the board shall have the right to adjust rates on an annual basis if the board shall deem such adjustment necessary.  The plan for active employees shall be on retention accounting basis, and a separate retention accounting basis shall be used for retired employees.  Any additional written information the carrier wishes to submit, supporting the proposed benefits and premium rate, may accompany the proposal.  After receiving the proposals, the board shall determine whether to contract with the carrier which has been determined to have submitted the lowest and best bid, or to reject all such bids and receive new proposals. The board shall authorize any corporation licensed to transact accident and health insurance business in this state issuing any such contract to reinsure portions of such contract with any other such corporation which elected to be a reinsurer and is legally competent to enter into a reinsurance agreement.  The board may designate one or more of such corporations as the administering corporation or corporations. Each employee who is covered under any such contract or contracts shall receive a certificate setting forth the benefits to which the employee is entitled thereunder, to whom such benefits shall be payable, to whom claims should be submitted, and summarizing the provisions of the contract principally affecting the employee.  Such certificate shall be in lieu of the certificate which the corporation or corporations issuing such contract or contracts would otherwise issue. The board may reject any and all bids and contracts under this section and may elect for the state to become a self-insurer; however, administration and service of any such self-insured program * * *may must be contracted to a third party by the board. Any contract with a third party to administer the plan shall be bid and entered into in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 25-15-301. (2)  By September 30 of each year, the board shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, Senate Insurance Committee, House Insurance Committee, Senate Education Committee, House Education Committee and Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review the condition of the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan.  Such report shall contain for the most recently completed fiscal year, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  The plan's financial condition at the close of the fiscal year. (b)  The history of yearly claims paid and premiums received for each premium class, including, but not limited to, active employees, dependents and retirees. (c)  The history of loss ratios for the active employees, dependents and retirees premium classes as well as historical trend of such ratios.  For the purposes of this section, the term "loss ratios" means claims paid by the plan for each premium class divided by premiums received by the plan for insurance coverage of the members in that premium class. (d)  Budgetary information, including: (i)  A detailed breakdown of all expenditures of the plan, administrative and otherwise, for the most recently completed fiscal year and projected expenditures, administrative and otherwise, for the current and next fiscal year; (ii)  A schedule of all contracts, administrative and otherwise, executed for the benefit of the plan during the most recent completed fiscal year and those executed and anticipated for the current fiscal year; and (iii)  A description of the processes used by the board to procure all contracts, administrative and otherwise, as well as a description of the scope of services to be provided by each contractor. Budgetary information shall be provided in a format designated by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The Joint Legislative Budget Committee, Senate Insurance Committee, House Insurance Committee * * *, Senate Education Committee, House Education Committee and Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review may request additional information or reports from the board on an as-needed basis. (3)  Annually, the board shall request, and the Department of Audit shall conduct, a comprehensive audit of the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan.  For purposes of this section, the audit required herein shall be separate and distinct from any audit prepared in conjunction with the development of the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR). SECTION 19.  Section 25-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-3.  For the purposes of this article, the words and phrases used herein shall have the following meanings: (a) "Employee" means a person who works full time for the State of Mississippi and receives his compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency or institution of the state government and any person who works full time for any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver.  This shall include legislators, employees of the legislative branch and the judicial branch of the state and "employees" shall include full-time salaried judges and full-time district attorneys and their staff and full-time compulsory school attendance officers.  For the purposes of this article, any "employee" making contributions to the State of Mississippi retirement plan shall be considered a full-time employee.  For purposes of this article, "employee" shall not mean contract personnel. (b) "Department" means the Department of Finance and Administration. (c)  "Plan" means the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan created under this article. (d)  "Fund" means the State and School Employees Insurance Fund set up under this article. (e) "Retiree" means any employee retired under the Mississippi retirement plan. (f)  "Board" means the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board created under Section 25-15-303. SECTION 20.  Section 25-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-5.  (1)  The board shall administer the plan and is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its administration, subject to the terms and limitations contained in this article. (2)  The board shall develop a five-year strategic plan for the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq.  The strategic plan shall address, but not be limited to: (a)  Changing trends in the health care industry, and how they effect delivery of services to members of the plan. (b)  Alternative service delivery systems. (c)  Any foreseeable problems with the present system of delivering and administering health care benefits in Mississippi. (d)  The development of options and recommendations for changes in the plan. (3)  To carry out the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the board may conduct formal research, including questionnaires and attitudinal surveys of members' needs and preferences with respect to service delivery. (4)  After the board has complied with all provisions of Section 25-15-9 regarding the establishment of the plan, it shall be responsible for fully disclosing to plan members the provisions of the plan.  Such disclosure shall consist of the dissemination of educational material on the plan and any proposed changes thereto.  The board shall provide members with complete educational materials at least thirty (30) days before the date upon which the plan's members must select a plan option for health care services.  The board shall further use the resources of the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television or other state agency, university or college to provide information on proposed changes.  The board may also use other state-owned media, as well as public service announcements on private media to disseminate information regarding proposed changes in the plan. (5)  The board shall develop and make available for public review at its offices a comprehensive plan document which documents all benefits for which members of the plan created by Section 25-15-3 et seq. are eligible.  This document shall be typed and maintained also at the offices of any administrator contracted with in accordance with Section 25-15-301. (6)  (a)  The board may enter into contracts with accountants, actuaries and other persons from the private sector whose skills are necessary to carry out the purposes of Section 25-15-3 et seq. (b)  Before the board enters into any contract for services as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the board shall first determine that the services are required, and that the staff of the board and personnel of other state agencies are not sufficiently experienced to provide the services. (c)  If the service is to be rendered for a period of in excess of six (6) months, the board shall seek and obtain bids for the service in a manner identical to that provided for in Section 25-15-301, subsection (1)(a) and (b) except for those provisions which specifically state criteria which are applicable only to third-party administrators contracted with in accordance with Section 25-15-3 et seq. (d)  The board is also authorized to procure legal services if it deems these services to be necessary to carry out its responsibilities under Section 25-15-3 et seq. SECTION 21.  Section 25-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-7.  Such health insurance shall not include expense incurred by or on account of an individual prior to July 1, 1972, as to him; dental care and treatment, except dental surgery and appliances to the extent necessary for the correction of damage caused by accidental injury while covered by the plan, or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan; eyeglasses, hearing aids for individuals over the age of twenty-one (21) years, and examinations for the prescription or fitting thereof; cosmetic surgery or treatment, except to the extent necessary for correction of damage by accidental injury while covered by the plan or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan; services received in a hospital owned or operated by the United States government for which no charge is made; services received for injury or sickness due to war or any act of war, whether declared or undeclared, which war or act of war shall have occurred after July 1, 1972; expense for which the individual is not required to make payment; expenses to the extent of benefits provided under any employer group plan other than this plan, in which the state participates in the cost thereof; and such other expenses as may be excluded by regulations of the board. SECTION 22.  Section 25-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-9.  (1)  (a)  The board shall design a plan of health insurance for state employees that provides benefits for semiprivate rooms in addition to other incidental coverages that the board deems necessary.  The amount of the coverages shall be in such reasonable amount as may be determined by the board to be adequate, after due consideration of current health costs in Mississippi.  The plan shall also include major medical benefits in such amounts as the board determines.  The plan shall provide for coverage for telemedicine services as provided in Section 83-9-351.  The board is also authorized to accept bids for such alternate coverage and optional benefits as the board deems proper.  The board is authorized to accept bids for surgical services that include assistance in locating a surgeon, setting up initial consultation, travel, a negotiated single case rate bundle and payment for orthopedic, spine, bariatric, cardiovascular and general surgeries.  The surgical services may only utilize surgeons and facilities located in the State of Mississippi unless otherwise provided by the board.  Any contract for alternative coverage and optional benefits shall be awarded by the board after it has carefully studied and evaluated the bids and selected the best and most cost-effective bid.  The board may reject all of the bids; however, the board shall notify all bidders of the rejection and shall actively solicit new bids if all bids are rejected.  The board may employ or contract for such consulting or actuarial services as may be necessary to formulate the plan, and to assist the board in the preparation of specifications and in the process of advertising for the bids for the plan. Those contracts shall be solicited and entered into in accordance with Section 25-15-5.  The board shall keep a record of all persons, agents and corporations who contract with or assist the board in preparing and developing the plan. The board in a timely manner shall provide copies of this record to the members of the advisory council created in this section and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council.  The board shall provide copies of this record in the solicitation of bids for the administration or servicing of the self-insured program.  Each person, agent or corporation that, during the previous fiscal year, has assisted in the development of the plan or employed or compensated any person who assisted in the development of the plan, and that bids on the administration or servicing of the plan, shall submit to the board a statement accompanying the bid explaining in detail its participation with the development of the plan.  This statement shall include the amount of compensation paid by the bidder to any such employee during the previous fiscal year.  The board shall make all such information available to the members of the advisory council and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council before any action is taken by the board on the bids submitted.  The failure of any bidder to fully and accurately comply with this paragraph shall result in the rejection of any bid submitted by that bidder or the cancellation of any contract executed when the failure is discovered after the acceptance of that bid.  The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subsection. The board shall develop plans for the insurance plan authorized by this section in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-15-5. Any corporation, association, company or individual that contracts with the board for the third-party claims administration of the self-insured plan shall prepare and keep on file an explanation of benefits for each claim processed.  The explanation of benefits shall contain such information relative to each processed claim that the board deems necessary, and, at a minimum, each explanation shall provide the claimant's name, claim number, provider number, provider name, service dates, type of services, amount of charges, amount allowed to the claimant and reason codes.  The information contained in the explanation of benefits shall be available for inspection upon request by the board.  The board shall have access to all claims information utilized in the issuance of payments to employees and providers. (b)  There is created an advisory council to advise the board in the formulation of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan.  The council shall be composed of the State Insurance Commissioner, or his designee, an employee-representative of the institutions of higher learning appointed by the board of trustees thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Transportation appointed by the director thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Revenue appointed by the Commissioner of Revenue, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Health appointed by the State Health Officer, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Corrections appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections, and an employee-representative of the Department of Human Services appointed by the Executive Director of Human Services, two (2) certificated public school administrators appointed by the State Board of Education, two (2) certificated classroom teachers appointed by the State Board of Education, a noncertificated school employee appointed by the State Board of Education and a community/junior college employee appointed by the Mississippi Community College Board. The Lieutenant Governor may designate the Secretary of the Senate, the Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate the Clerk of the House, the Chairman of the House Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the House Education Committee and the Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, to attend any meeting of the State and School Employees Insurance Advisory Council.  The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend the meetings of the council.  Those designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council.  For attending meetings of the council, the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the council will be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the council without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses. (c)  No change in the terms of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan may be made effective unless the board, or its designee, has provided notice to the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council and has called a meeting of the council at least fifteen (15) days before the effective date of the change.  If the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council does not meet to advise the board on the proposed changes, the changes to the plan shall become effective at such time as the board has informed the council that the changes shall become effective. (d)  Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents under age sixty-five (65) years and not eligible for Medicare benefits.  For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to retired employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants.  For employees who retire on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to those retiring employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits only if the retiring employees were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more before their retirement, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants.  This section will apply to those employees who retire due to one hundred percent (100%) medical disability as well as those employees electing early retirement. (e)  Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits.  For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the health insurance coverage available to retired employees over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, shall be the major medical coverage.  For employees retiring on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System, the health insurance coverage described in this paragraph (e) shall be available to those retiring employees only if they were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more and are over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and to all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits.  Benefits shall be reduced by Medicare benefits as though the Medicare benefits were the base plan. All covered individuals shall be assumed to have full Medicare coverage, Parts A and B; and any Medicare payments under both Parts A and B shall be computed to reduce benefits payable under this plan. (f)  Lifetime maximum: The lifetime maximum amount of benefits payable under the health insurance plan for each participant is Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). (2)  Nonduplication of benefits  reduction of benefits by Title XIX benefits:  When benefits would be payable under more than one (1) group plan, benefits under those plans will be coordinated to the extent that the total benefits under all plans will not exceed the total expenses incurred. Benefits for hospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similar benefits payable in accordance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act or under any amendments thereto, or any implementing legislation. Benefits for hospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similar benefits payable by workers' compensation. No health care benefits under the state plan shall restrict coverage for medically appropriate treatment prescribed by a physician and agreed to by a fully informed insured, or if the insured lacks legal capacity to consent by a person who has legal authority to consent on his or her behalf, based on an insured's diagnosis with a terminal condition.  As used in this paragraph, "terminal condition" means any aggressive malignancy, chronic end-stage cardiovascular or cerebral vascular disease, or any other disease, illness or condition which physician diagnoses as terminal. Not later than January 1, 2016, the state health plan shall not require a higher co-payment, deductible or coinsurance amount for patient-administered anti-cancer medications, including, but not limited to, those orally administered or self-injected, than it requires for anti-cancer medications that are injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider, regardless of the formulation or benefit category determination by the plan.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "anti-cancer medications" has the meaning as defined in Section 83-9-24. (3)  (a)  Schedule of life insurance benefits  group term:  The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of a department, agency or institution of the state government shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee's annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis.  The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years.  Employees retiring after June 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement. (b)  Effective October 1, 1999, schedule of life insurance benefits  group term:  The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee's annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis.  The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years.  Employees of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver retiring after September 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement. (4)  Any eligible employee who on March 1, 1971, was participating in a group life insurance program that has provisions different from those included in this article and for which the State of Mississippi was paying a part of the premium may, at his discretion, continue to participate in that plan.  The employee shall pay in full all additional costs, if any, above the minimum program established by this article.  Under no circumstances shall any individual who begins employment with the state after March 1, 1971, be eligible for the provisions of this subsection. (5)  The board may offer medical savings accounts as defined in Section 71-9-3 as a plan option. (6)  Any premium differentials, differences in coverages, discounts determined by risk or by any other factors shall be uniformly applied to all active employees participating in the insurance plan.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the state contribution to the plan be the same for each employee throughout the state. (7)  On October 1, 1999, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to remain with an existing policy or policies of group life insurance with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  On or after July 1, 2004, until October 1, 2004, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to choose a policy or policies of group life insurance existing on October 1, 1999, with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  The state's contribution of up to fifty percent (50%) of the active employee's premium under the State and School Life Insurance Plan may be applied toward the cost of coverage for full-time employees participating in the approved life insurance company group plan.  For purposes of this subsection (7), "life insurance company group plan" means a plan administered or sold by a private insurance company.  After October 1, 1999, the board may assess charges in addition to the existing State and School Life Insurance Plan rates to such employees as a condition of enrollment in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.  In order for any life insurance company group plan to be approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board under this subsection (7), it shall meet the following criteria: (a)  The insurance company offering the group life insurance plan shall be rated "A-" or better by A.M. Best state insurance rating service and be licensed as an admitted carrier in the State of Mississippi by the Mississippi Department of Insurance. (b)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall provide the same life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance and waiver of premium benefits as provided in the State and School Life Insurance Plan. (c)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall be fully insured, and no form of self-funding life insurance by the company shall be approved. (d)  The insurance company group life insurance plan shall have one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for active employees regardless of age and one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for all retirees regardless of age or type of retiree. (e)  The insurance company and its group life insurance plan shall comply with any administrative requirements of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board.  If any insurance company providing group life insurance benefits to employees under this subsection (7) fails to comply with any requirements specified in this subsection or any administrative requirements of the board, the state shall discontinue providing funding for the cost of that insurance. SECTION 23.  Section 25-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-13.  Each eligible employee may participate in the  plan by signing up for the plan at the time of employment.  Each eligible employee who declines coverage under the plan must sign a waiver of coverage.  After acceptance in the plan, the employee may cease his or her participation by filing a specific disclaimer with the board. Forms for this purpose shall be prescribed and issued by the board.  All eligible employees will be eligible to participate in the plan on the effective date of the plan or on the date on which they are employed by the state, whichever is later, provided they make the necessary contributions as provided in this article.  Spouses of employees, unmarried dependent children from birth to age nineteen (19) years, unmarried dependent children who are full-time students up to age twenty-five (25) years, and children with physical or mental disabilities, regardless of age, are eligible under the plan as of the date the employee becomes eligible.  If both spouses are eligible employees who participate in the plan, the benefits shall apply individually to each spouse by virtue of his or her participation in the plan.  If those spouses also have one or more eligible dependents participating in the plan, the cost of their dependents shall be calculated at a special family plan rate.  The cost for participation by the dependents shall be paid by the spouse who elects to carry such dependents under his or her coverage. SECTION 24.  Section 25-15-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-14.  Any elected state or district official who does not run for reelection or who is defeated before being entitled to receive a retirement allowance shall be eligible to continue to participate in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan under the same conditions and coverages for retired employees. SECTION 25.  Section 25-15-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-15.  (1)  The board is authorized to determine the manner in which premiums and contributions by the state agencies, local school districts, colleges, universities, community/junior colleges and public libraries shall be collected to provide the self-insured health insurance program for employees as provided under this article.  The state shall provide fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the above life insurance plan for all active full-time employees.  The state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan for active full-time employees initially employed before January 1, 2006, except as otherwise provided in this section.  For active full-time employees initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance, except as otherwise provided in this section, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan.  The board, if determined to be necessary, may assess active full-time employees a portion of the active employee premium in an amount not to exceed Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per month, notwithstanding any language in this section to the contrary.  All active full-time employees shall be given the opportunity to purchase coverage for their eligible dependents with the premiums for such dependent coverage, as well as the employee's fifty percent (50%) share for his life insurance coverage, to be deductible from the employee's salary by the agency, department or institution head, which deductions, together with the fifty percent (50%) share of such life insurance premiums of such employing agency, department or institution head from funds appropriated to or authorized to be expended by the employing agency, department or institution head, shall be deposited directly into a depository bank or special fund in the State Treasury, as determined by the board.  These funds and interest earned on these funds may be used for the disbursement of claims and shall be exempt from the appropriation process. (2)  The state shall provide annually, by line item in the Mississippi Library Commission appropriation bill, such funds to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for full-time library staff members in each public library in Mississippi initially employed before January 1, 2006.  For full-time library staff members initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan.  The commission shall allot to each public library a sufficient amount of those funds appropriated to pay the costs of insurance for eligible employees.  Any funds so appropriated by line item which are not expended during the fiscal year for which such funds were appropriated shall be carried forward for the same purposes during the next succeeding fiscal year.  If any premiums for the health insurance and/or late charges and interest penalties are not paid by a public library in a timely manner, as defined by the board, the Mississippi Library Commission, upon notice by the board, shall immediately withhold all subsequent disbursements of funds to that public library. (3)  The state shall annually provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for public school district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week and regular nonstudent school bus drivers, if such employees and school bus drivers were initially employed before January 1, 2006.  For such employees and school bus drivers initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan.  Where federal funding is allowable to defray, in full or in part, the cost of participation in the program by district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during the week and regular nonstudent bus drivers, whose salaries are paid, in full or in part, by federal funds, the allowance under this section shall be reduced to the extent of such federal funding. Where the use of federal funds is allowable but not available, it is the intent of the Legislature that school districts contribute the cost of participation for such employees from local funds, except that parent fees for child nutrition programs shall not be increased to cover such cost. (4)  The state shall provide annually, by line item in the community/junior college appropriation bill, such funds to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for community/junior college district employees initially employed before January 1, 2006, who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week.  For such employees initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan. (5)  When the use of federal funding is allowable to defray, in full or in part, the cost of participation in the insurance plan by community/junior college district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week, whose salaries are paid, in full or in part, by federal funds, the allowance under this section shall be reduced to the extent of the federal funding.  Where the use of federal funds is allowable but not available, it is the intent of the Legislature that community/junior college districts contribute the cost of participation for such employees from local funds. (6)  Any community/junior college district may contribute to the cost of coverage for any district employee from local community/junior college district funds, and any public school district may contribute to the cost of coverage for any district employee from nonminimum program funds.  Any part of the cost of such coverage for participating employees of public school districts and public community/junior college districts that is not paid by the state shall be paid by the participating employees, which shall be deducted from the salaries of the employees in a manner determined by the board. (7)  Any funds appropriated for the cost of insurance by line item in the community/junior colleges appropriation bill which are not expended during the fiscal year for which such funds were appropriated shall be carried forward for the same purposes during the next succeeding fiscal year. (8)  The board may establish and enforce late charges and interest penalties or other penalties for the purpose of requiring the prompt payment of all premiums for life and health insurance permitted under this chapter.  All funds in excess of the amount needed for disbursement of claims shall be deposited in a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the State and School Employees Insurance Fund. The State Treasurer shall invest all funds in the State and School Employees Insurance Fund and all interest earned shall be credited to the State and School Employees Insurance Fund.  Such funds shall be placed with one or more depositories of the state and invested on the first day such funds are available for investment in certificates of deposit, repurchase agreements or in United States Treasury bills or as otherwise authorized by law for the investment of Public Employees' Retirement System funds, as long as such investment is made from competitive offering and at the highest and best market rate obtainable consistent with any available investment alternatives; however, such investments shall not be made in shares of stock, common or preferred, or in any other investments which would mature more than one (1) year from the date of investment.  The board shall have the authority to draw from this fund periodically such funds as are necessary to operate the self-insurance plan or to pay to the insurance carrier the cost of operation of this plan, it being the purpose to limit the amount of participation by the state to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the life insurance program and not to limit the contracting for additional benefits where the cost will be paid in full by the employee.  The state shall not share in the cost of coverage for retired employees. (9)  The board shall also provide for the creation of an Insurance Reserve Fund and funds therein shall be invested by the State Treasurer with all interest earned credited to the State and School Employees Insurance Fund. (10)  Any retired employee electing to purchase retired life and health insurance will have the full cost of such insurance deducted monthly from his State of Mississippi retirement plan check or direct billed for the cost of the premium if the retirement check is insufficient to pay for the premium.  If the board determines actuarially that the premium paid by the participating retirees adversely affects the overall cost of the plan to the state, then the board may impose a premium surcharge, not to exceed fifteen percent (15%), upon such participating retired employees who are under the age for Medicare eligibility and who were initially employed before January 1, 2006.  For participating retired employees who are under the age for Medicare eligibility and who were initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the board may impose a premium surcharge in an amount the board determines actuarially to cover the full cost of insurance. (11)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. SECTION 26.  Section 25-15-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-16.  The public school districts of the state, in their discretion, may pay with local funds one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance premiums of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for all retired members of the Public Employees' Retirement System who are employed as school bus drivers by the school districts.  No state funds shall be used for payment of the health insurance premiums under the authority of this section.  If a school district chooses to pay the health insurance premiums for school bus drivers under the authority of this section, the district shall be authorized to pay any amount that is one hundred percent (100%) or less of the cost of the health insurance premiums for the school bus drivers. SECTION 27.  Section 25-15-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-17.  (1)  Any benefits payable under the plan may be made either directly to the attending physicians, hospitals, medical groups, or others furnishing the services upon which a claim is based, or to the covered employee, upon presentation of valid bills for such services, subject to subsection (3) of this section and such provisions to facilitate payment as may be made by the board.  All benefits payable under this plan shall be payable directly to the covered employee unless such covered employee shall make a valid assignment in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. (2)  The plan may not, by its terms, limit or restrict the covered employee's ability to assign the covered employee's benefits under the policy to a licensed health care provider that provides health care services to the covered employee.  Any such plan provision in violation of this subsection shall be invalid. (3)  If the covered employee provides the board with written direction that all or a portion of any indemnities or benefits provided by the plan be paid to a licensed health care provider rendering hospital, nursing, medical or surgical services, then the plan shall pay directly the licensed health care provider rendering such services.  That payment shall be considered payment in full to the provider, who may not bill or collect from the covered employee any amount above that payment, other than the deductible, coinsurance, copayment or other charges for equipment or services requested by the covered employee that are noncovered benefits after the signing of an explanatory document about the noncovered benefit by the covered employee. SECTION 28.  Section 25-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-19.  On or before July 1, 1972, the board shall notify all department, agency and institution heads that the employee deductions shall commence on said date. SECTION 29.  Section 25-15-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-23.  No agency, board, school district, community/junior college, public library, university, institution or authority of the state shall withdraw, or authorize any agency or institution under its management and control to withdraw, from the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan established under this chapter. SECTION 30.  Section 41-149-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-149-5. Prohibition of certain discriminatory actions related to reimbursement of 340B entities.  (1)  With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third-party payor, or its agent shall not do any of the following: (a)  Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug. (b)  Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 USC 256b or that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following: (i)  Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments.  For purposes of this item 1, the term "other adjustment" includes placing any additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor. (ii)  Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities. (iii)  Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks. (iv)  Requirements relating to the frequency or scope of audits of inventory management systems. (v)  Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Division of Medicaid for the administration of the Mississippi Medicaid program. (vi)  Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-340B entities. (c)  Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related to 340B drug pricing. (d)  Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any patient's choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such drugs.  For purposes of this subparagraph (iv), it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or interferes with a patient's choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Division of Medicaid in administration of the Mississippi Medicaid program. (e)  Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B entity or prevents or interferes with an individual's choice to receive a prescription drug from a 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive drugs from a 340B entity. (f)  Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor. (g)  Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs subject to an agreement under 42 USC 256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities. (2)  Nothing in this chapter applies to the Mississippi Medicaid program as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 USC 1396r-8(k). SECTION 31.  Section 41-151-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-151-7.  (1)  A health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or the agent of either shall not: (a)  Refuse to authorize, approve, or pay a participating provider for providing covered physician-administered drugs and related covered services to covered persons; or (b)  Require a covered person to pay any penalty or additional fee not otherwise applicable to cost-sharing amounts payable by the covered person as designated within the benefit plan to obtain the physician-administered drug when provided by a participating provider. (2)  All provider agreements are hereby construed to include a provision that requires that when all criteria for medical necessity are met, that the drug and its administration will be payable irrespective of whether the participating provider obtains physician-administered drugs from a pharmacy that is not a participating provider in the health insurance issuer's network. The drug supplied shall meet the supply chain security controls and chain of distribution set by the federal Drug Supply Chain Security Act. (3)  The payment to a participating provider shall be at the rate set forth in the health insurance issuer's agreement with the participating provider applicable to such drugs, or if no such rate is included in the agreement, then at the wholesale acquisition cost. (4)  Any provision of a contract that is contrary to any provision of this chapter shall be null, void, and unenforceable in this state. SECTION 32.  Section 73-21-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-205.  (1)  (a) Pharmacists may provide additional information to a patient to allow them an opportunity to consider affordable alternative payment options when acquiring their prescription medication. (b)  Any provision of any contract or agreement contrary to the provisions of Sections 73-21-201 through 73-21-205 shall be considered in violation of public policy and shall be void. (2)  Compliance with this section shall not constitute a violation of any contract or provision of any agreement to which the pharmacist or pharmacy is a party. (3)  Neither the board, any pharmacy benefit manager nor any third party shall penalize a pharmacist for acting or failing to act under this section, nor shall a pharmacist or his agents or employees be liable for any act or failure to act under this section. SECTION 33.  If the application or operation of any section, subsection, paragraph, sentence, clause, word or provision of this act shall be enjoined or otherwise made inoperative by a court of competent jurisdiction on the grounds that state or federal law invalidates the application or operation thereof, this act shall be valid and effective in all other applications and operations, and no section, subsection, paragraph, sentence, clause, word or other provision shall on account of any pending litigation be deemed invalid or ineffective except as to that language which has been enjoined or otherwise made inoperative, then only until the injunction is removed. SECTION 34.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-171, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-171. Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-169, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are the provisions of the Pharmacy Benefit Prompt Pay Act, shall stand repealed on July 1, 2029. SECTION 35.  The following shall be codified as Section 25-15-307, Mississippi Code of 1972: 25-15-307. Sections 25-15-301 through 25-15-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, which relate to the administration of group insurance plans for public employees, shall stand repealed on July 1, 2029. SECTION 36.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.